Illinois, session 104th, HB2661.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Firearm Concealed Carry Act is amended by 5changing Section 60 as follows: 6    (430 ILCS 66/60)7    Sec. 60. Fees. 8    (a) All fees collected under this Act shall be deposited 9as provided in this Section. Application, renewal, and 10replacement fees shall be non-refundable.11    (b) An applicant for a new license or a renewal shall 12submit $150 with the application, of which $120 shall be 13apportioned to the State Police Firearm Services Fund, $20 14shall be apportioned to the Mental Health Reporting Fund, and 15$10 shall be apportioned to the State Crime Laboratory Fund.16    (c) A non-resident applicant for a new license or renewal 17shall submit $300 with the application, of which $250 shall be 18apportioned to the State Police Firearm Services Fund, $40 19shall be apportioned to the Mental Health Reporting Fund, and 20$10 shall be apportioned to the State Crime Laboratory Fund.21    (d) A licensee requesting a new license in accordance with 22Section 55 shall submit $5 $75, of which $60 shall be 23apportioned to the State Police Firearm Services Fund, $5   HB2661- 2 -LRB104 05802 BDA 15833 b1shall be apportioned to the Mental Health Reporting Fund, and 2$10 shall be apportioned to the State Crime Laboratory Fund. 3The fees collected under this Section shall be deposited into 4the State Police Firearm Services Fund. 5(Source: P.A. 98-63, eff. 7-9-13.)